Utah statutes.
75-5-413.   Acceptance of appointment -- Consent to jurisdiction.

By accepting appointment, a conservator submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the estate that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the conservator or mailed to him by registered or certified mail at his address as listed in the petition for appointment, or as thereafter reported to the court, and to his address as then known to the petitioner.

